Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:(1) When the secretary has reasonable cause to believe that an employee has possessed contraband on the premises of a state correctional facility, notwithstanding any rule adopted under chapter 41.06 RCW the secretary shall immediately suspend the employee.(2) The secretary shall immediately institute proceedings to terminate the employment of any person:(a) Who is found by the department, based on a preponderance of the evidence, to have possessed any contraband on the premises of a state correctional institution; or(b) Upon a guilty plea or conviction of either RCW 9.94.043 or 9.94.045.(3) When the secretary has reasonable cause to believe that an employee of a contractor has possessed contraband on the premises of a state correctional institution, the secretary shall require the employee of a contractor to be immediately removed from any employment position which would permit the employee to have any access to the premises of the correctional institution.(4) The secretary shall disqualify for employment with a contractor in any position with access to a correctional institution, any person:(a) Who is found by the department, based on a preponderance of the evidence, to have possessed any contraband on the premises of a state correctional institution; or(b) Upon a guilty plea or conviction of either RCW 9.94.043 or 9.94.045.(5) The secretary, when considering the renewal of a contract with a contractor who has taken action under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, shall require the contractor to demonstrate that there has been significant progress made in reducing the likelihood that any of its employees possess contraband on the premises of a correctional institution. The secretary shall examine whether the contractor has taken steps to improve hiring, training, and monitoring practices and whether the employee remains with the contractor. The secretary shall not renew a contract unless he or she determines that significant progress has been made.(6)(a) For the purposes of RCW 50.20.060, a person terminated under this section shall be considered discharged for misconduct.(b)(i) The department may, within its discretion or upon request of any member of the public, release information to an individual or to the public regarding any person or contract terminated under this section.(ii) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470 is immune from civil liability for damages for any discretionary release of relevant and necessary information, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The immunity provided under this section applies to the release of relevant and necessary information to other public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the public.(iii) Except as provided in chapter 42.56 RCW, or elsewhere, nothing in this section shall impose any liability upon a public official, public employee, or public agency for failing to release information authorized under this section. Nothing in this section implies that information regarding persons designated in subsection (2) of this section is confidential except as may otherwise be provided by law.(7) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. The rules shall reflect the legislative intent that this section prohibits individuals who are employed by the department or a contractor of the department from possessing contraband on any state correctional institution premises.(8) As used in this section:(a) "Contractor" includes all subcontractors of a contractor; and(b) "Contraband" means contraband as defined in RCW 72.09.015, and also includes any object that threatens the security of the institution, unlawfully possessed weapons, or illegal drugs.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:(1) When the secretary has reasonable cause to believe that an employee has possessed contraband on the premises of an institution, notwithstanding any rule adopted under chapter 41.06 RCW the secretary shall immediately suspend the employee.(2) The secretary shall immediately institute proceedings to terminate the employment of any person:(a) Who is found by the department, based on a preponderance of the evidence, to have possessed any contraband on the premises of an institution; or(b) Upon a guilty plea or conviction of either RCW 9.94.043 or 9.94.045.(3) When the secretary has reasonable cause to believe that an employee of a contractor has possessed contraband on the premises of an institution, the secretary shall require the employee of a contractor to be immediately removed from any employment position which would permit the employee to have any access to the premises of an institution.(4) The secretary shall disqualify for employment with a contractor in any position with access to an institution, any person:(a) Who is found by the department, based on a preponderance of the evidence, to have possessed any contraband on the premises of an institution; or(b) Upon a guilty plea or conviction of either RCW 9.94.043 or 9.94.045.(5) The secretary, when considering the renewal of a contract with a contractor who has taken action under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, shall require the contractor to demonstrate that there has been significant progress made in reducing the likelihood that any of its employees possess contraband on the premises of an institution. The secretary shall examine whether the contractor has taken steps to improve hiring, training, and monitoring practices and whether the employee remains with the contractor. The secretary shall not renew a contract unless he or she determines that significant progress has been made.(6)(a) For the purposes of RCW 50.20.060, a person terminated under this section shall be considered discharged for misconduct.(b)(i) The department may, within its discretion or upon request of any member of the public, release information to an individual or to the public regarding any person or contract terminated under this section.(ii) An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as defined in RCW 4.24.470 is immune from civil liability for damages for any discretionary release of relevant and necessary information, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The immunity provided under this section applies to the release of relevant and necessary information to other public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the public.(iii) Except as provided in chapter 42.56 RCW, or elsewhere, nothing in this section shall impose any liability upon a public official, public employee, or public agency for failing to release information authorized under this section. Nothing in this section implies that information regarding persons designated in subsection (2) of this section is confidential except as may otherwise be provided by law.(7) The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. The rules shall reflect the legislative intent that this section prohibits individuals who are employed by the department or a contractor of the department from possessing contraband on any state correctional institution premises.(8) As used in this section:(a) "Contractor" includes all subcontractors of a contractor; and(b) "Contraband" includes, at minimum, any object that threatens the security of the institution, unlawfully possessed weapons, or illegal drugs.--- END ---